Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1188.
do enact as follows:AB1188,11Section 1. 5.02 (21) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1188,3,725.02 (21) “Spring election” means the election held on the first Tuesday in 3April to elect judicial, educational, and municipal officers, nonpartisan county 4officers and, sewerage commissioners, and emergency services district board 5members and to express preferences for the person to be the presidential candidate 6for each party in a year in which electors for president and vice president are to be 7elected.AB1188,28Section 2. 5.58 (1u) of the statutes is created to read:AB1188,3,1495.58 (1u) Emergency services district board. Except as authorized in s. 105.655, there shall be a separate ballot for members of the emergency services 11district board. Arrangement of the names on the ballot shall be determined by the 12emergency services district clerk in the manner provided under s. 5.60 (1) (b). The 13ballot shall be entitled “Official Primary Ballot for Member of the Emergency 14Services District Board.”AB1188,31Section 3. 5.58 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is created to read:AB1188,4,325.58 (3) (intro.) The following individuals shall be nominees for office at the 3spring election and their names shall appear on the official spring ballot:AB1188,44Section 4. 5.58 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 5.58 (3) (a) and amended to 5read:AB1188,4,865.58 (3) (a) Only 2 candidates for state superintendent, for any judicial office, 7or for any elected seat on a metropolitan sewerage commission or town sanitary 8district commission, in.AB1188,4,109(b) In counties having a population of 750,000 or more, only 2 candidates for 10the office of comptroller and.AB1188,4,1211(c) In counties having a population of 750,000 or more, only 2 candidates for 12member of the board of supervisors within each district, in. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab1188 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab1188 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1188 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB1188 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB1188: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting